Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-620
Severability.

If, for any reason, any of the foregoing sections 42-603 and 42-617 to 42-619 or any part thereof are held to be invalid, the Legislature declares that it would have passed section 6 irrespective of the fact that such sections or any part thereof may be declared invalid.

Laws 1949, c. 129, § 5, p. 339.
Section 6, referred to in this section was a specific repeal of all sections of Chapter 156, Laws 1947, which was the act adopting a Community Property Law in Nebraska.